Delaware, session 153, HB239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Section 9 of Article II of the Delaware Constitution by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 9. Rules; punishment and expulsion of members; scope of powers. Section 9. Each House may determine the rules of its proceedings, provided, however, no rule or rules may be suspended without the concurrence of three-fifths of all members elected to the particular house desiring to suspend a rule or rules. Each House may punish any of its members for disorderly behavior, and with the concurrence of two-thirds of all the members elected thereto expel a member, and shall have all other powers necessary for a branch of the Legislature of a free and independent State. SYNOPSIS This is the First Leg Constitutional Amendment to require a three-fifths vote to suspend rules.